Rhode Island, session 2025, SB459.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 28-30-18 of the General Laws in Chapter 28-30 entitled "Workers’
Compensation Court" is hereby amended to read as follows:
28-30-18. Additional benefits payable to retired judges and their surviving spouses or
domestic partners.
(a) All judges of the workers’ compensation court, or their surviving spouses or domestic
partners, who retire after January 1, 1970, and who receive a retirement allowance pursuant to the
provisions of this title, shall, on the first day of January next following the third anniversary date
of their retirement, receive a cost-of-living retirement adjustment in addition to his or her retirement
allowance in an amount equal to three percent (3%) of the original retirement allowance. In each
succeeding subsequent year during the month of January the retirement allowance shall be
increased an additional three percent (3%) of the original allowance, compounded annually from
the year the cost-of-living adjustment was first payable to be continued during the lifetime of that
judge or his or her surviving spouse or domestic partner. For the purpose of that computation, credit
shall be given for a full calendar year regardless of the effective date of the retirement allowance.
(b) Any judge who retired prior to January 31, 1980, shall be deemed for the purpose of
this section to have retired on January 1, 1980.
(c) For judges not eligible to retire as of September 30, 2009, and not eligible upon passage
of this article, and for their beneficiaries, the cost-of-living adjustment described in subsection (a)

above shall only apply to the first thirty-five thousand dollars ($35,000) of retirement allowance,
indexed annually, and shall commence upon the third (3rd) anniversary of the date of retirement or
when the retiree reaches age sixty-five (65), whichever is later. The thirty-five thousand dollar
($35,000) limit shall increase annually by the percentage increase in the Consumer Price Index for
all Urban Consumers (CPI-U) as published by the United States Department of Labor Statistics
determined as of September 30 of the prior calendar year or three percent (3%), whichever is less.
The first thirty-five thousand dollars ($35,000), as indexed, of retirement allowance shall be
multiplied by the percentage of increase in the Consumer Price Index for all Urban Consumers
(CPI-U) as published by the United States Department of Labor Statistics determined as of
September 30 of the prior calendar year or three percent (3%), whichever is less on the month
following the anniversary date of each succeeding year. For judges eligible to retire as of September
30, 2009, or eligible upon passage of this article, and for their beneficiaries, the provisions of this
subsection (c) shall not apply.
(d) This subsection (d) shall be effective for the period July 1, 2012, through June 30, 2015.
(1) Notwithstanding the prior paragraphs of this section, and subject to subsection (d)(2)
below, for all present and former justices, active and retired justices, and beneficiaries receiving
any retirement, disability or death allowance or benefit of any kind, whether provided for or on
behalf of justices engaged on or prior to December 31, 1989, as a noncontributory justice or
engaged after December 31, 1989, as a contributory justice, the annual benefit adjustment provided
in any calendar year under this section shall be equal to (A) multiplied by (B) where (A) is equal
to the percentage determined by subtracting five and one-half percent (5.5%) (the “subtrahend”)
from the five-year average investment return of the retirement system determined as of the last day
of the plan year preceding the calendar year in which the adjustment is granted, said percentage not
to exceed four percent (4%) and not to be less than zero percent (0%), and (B) is equal to the lesser
of the justice’s retirement allowance or the first twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) of
retirement allowance, such twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) amount to be indexed annually
in the same percentage as determined under (d)(1)(A) above. The “five-year average investment
return” shall mean the average of the investment return of the most recent five (5) plan years as
determined by the retirement board. Subject to subsection (d)(2) below, the benefit adjustment
provided by this paragraph shall commence upon the third (3rd) anniversary of the date of
retirement or the date on which the retiree reaches his or her Social Security retirement age,
whichever is later. In the event the retirement board adjusts the actuarially assumed rate of return
for the system, either upward or downward, the subtrahend shall be adjusted either upward or
downward in the same amount.
LC001670 - Page 2 of 6

(2) Except as provided in subsection (d)(3), the benefit adjustments under this section for
any plan year shall be suspended in their entirely unless the funded ratio of the employees’
retirement system of Rhode Island, the judicial retirement benefits trust, and the state police
retirement benefits trust, calculated by the system’s actuary on an aggregate basis, exceeds eighty
percent (80%) in which event the benefit adjustment will be reinstated for all justices for such plan
year.
In determining whether a funding level under this subsection (d)(2) has been achieved, the
actuary shall calculate the funding percentage after taking into account the reinstatement of any
current or future benefit adjustment provided under this section.
(3) Notwithstanding subsection (d)(2), in each fifth plan year commencing after June 30,
2012, commencing with the plan year ending June 30, 2017, and subsequently at intervals of five
(5) plan years, a benefit adjustment shall be calculated and made in accordance with subsection
(d)(1) above until the funded ratio of the employees’ retirement system of Rhode Island, the judicial
retirement benefits trust, and the state police retirement benefits trust, calculated by the system’s
actuary on an aggregate basis, exceeds eighty percent (80%).
(4) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the provisions of this subsection
(d) shall become effective July 1, 2012, and shall apply to any benefit adjustment not granted on or
prior to June 30, 2012.
(e) This subsection (e) shall become effective July 1, 2015.
(1)(i) As soon as administratively reasonable following the enactment into law of this
subsection (e)(1)(i), a one-time benefit adjustment shall be provided to justices and/or beneficiaries
of justices who retired on or before June 30, 2012, in the amount of two percent (2%) of the lesser
of either the justice’s retirement allowance or the first twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) of
the justice’s retirement allowance. This one-time benefit adjustment shall be provided without
regard to the retiree’s age or number of years since retirement.
(ii) Notwithstanding the prior subsections of this section, for all present and former justices,
active and retired justices, and beneficiaries receiving any retirement, disability or death allowance
or benefit of any kind, whether provided for or on behalf of justices engaged on or prior to
December 31, 1989, as a noncontributory justice or engaged after December 31, 1989, as a
contributory justice, the annual benefit adjustment provided in any calendar year under this section
for adjustments on and after January 1, 2016, and subject to subsection (e)(2) below, shall be equal
to (A) multiplied by (B):
(A) Shall equal the sum of fifty percent (50%) of (I) plus fifty percent (50%) of (II) where:
(I) Is equal to the percentage determined by subtracting five and one-half percent (5.5%)
LC001670 - Page 3 of 6

(the “subtrahend”) from the five-year average investment return of the retirement system
determined as of the last day of the plan year preceding the calendar year in which the adjustment
is granted, said percentage not to exceed four percent (4%) and not to be less than zero percent
(0%). The “five-year average investment return” shall mean the average of the investment returns
of the most recent five (5) plan years as determined by the retirement board. In the event the
retirement board adjusts the actuarially assumed rate of return for the system, either upward or
downward, the subtrahend shall be adjusted either upward or downward in the same amount.
(II) Is equal to the lesser of three percent (3%) or the percentage increase in the Consumer
Price Index for all Urban Consumers (CPI-U) as published by the United States Department of
Labor Statistics determined as of September 30 of the prior calendar year. In no event shall the sum
of (I) plus (II) exceed three and one-half percent (3.5%) or be less than zero percent (0%).
(B) Is equal to the lesser of either the justice’s retirement allowance or the first twenty-five
thousand eight hundred and fifty-five dollars ($25,855) of retirement allowance, such amount to be
indexed annually in the same percentage as determined under subsection (e)(1)(ii)(A) above.
The benefit adjustments provided by this subsection (e)(1)(ii) shall be provided to all
retirees entitled to receive a benefit adjustment as of June 30, 2012, under the law then in effect,
and for all other retirees the benefit adjustments shall commence upon the third anniversary of the
date of retirement or the date on which the retiree reaches his or her Social Security retirement age,
whichever is later.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (e)(3), the benefit adjustments under subsection
(e)(1)(ii) for any plan year shall be suspended in their entirety unless the funded ratio of the
employees’ retirement system of Rhode Island, the judicial retirement benefits trust, and the state
police retirement benefits trust, calculated by the system’s actuary on an aggregate basis, exceeds
eighty percent (80%) in which event the benefit adjustment will be reinstated for all justices for
such plan year. Effective July 1, 2024, the funded ratio of the employees’ retirement system of
Rhode Island, the judicial retirement benefits trust, and the state police retirement benefits trust,
calculated by the system’s actuary on an aggregate basis, of exceeding eighty percent (80%) for the
benefit adjustment to be reinstated for all members for such plan year shall be replaced with
seventy-five percent (75%).
In determining whether a funding level under this subsection (e)(2) has been achieved, the
actuary shall calculate the funding percentage after taking into account the reinstatement of any
current or future benefit adjustment provided under this section.
(3) Notwithstanding subsection (e)(2), in each fourth plan year commencing after June 30,
2012, commencing with the plan year ending June 30, 2016, and subsequently at intervals of four
LC001670 - Page 4 of 6

plan years: (i) A benefit adjustment shall be calculated and made in accordance with subsection
(e)(1)(ii) above; and (ii) Effective for members and/or beneficiaries of members who retired on or
before June 30, 2015, the dollar amount in subsection (e)(1)(ii)(B) of twenty-five thousand eight
hundred and fifty-five dollars ($25,855) shall be replaced with thirty-one thousand and twenty-six
dollars ($31,026) until the funded ratio of the employees’ retirement system of Rhode Island, the
judicial retirement benefits trust, and the state police retirement benefits trust, calculated by the
system’s actuary on an aggregate basis, exceeds eighty percent (80%). Effective July 1, 2024, the
funded ratio of the employees’ retirement system of Rhode Island, the judicial retirement benefits
trust, and the state police retirement benefits trust, calculated by the system’s actuary on an
aggregate basis, of exceeding eighty percent (80%) shall be replaced with seventy-five percent
(75%).
(4) Effective for members and/or beneficiaries of members who have retired on or before
July 1, 2015, a one-time stipend of five hundred dollars ($500) shall be payable within sixty (60)
days following the enactment of the legislation implementing this provision, and a second one-time
stipend of five hundred dollars ($500) in the same month of the following year. These stipends
shall be payable to all retired members or beneficiaries receiving a benefit as of the applicable
payment date and shall not be considered cost of living adjustments under the prior provisions of
this section.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001670
========
LC001670 - Page 5 of 6